Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.200

Conditional sales contracts for acquisition of property or property rights.

Any school district may execute an executory conditional sales contract with any other municipal corporation, the state or any of its political subdivisions, the government of the United States or any private party for the purchase of any real or personal property, or property rights, in connection with the exercise of any powers or duties which they now or hereafter are authorized to exercise, if the entire amount of the purchase price specified in such contract does not result in a total indebtedness in excess of the limitation authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without the assent of the voters: PROVIDED, That if such a proposed contract would result in a total indebtedness in excess of the limitation authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without the assent of the voters, a proposition in regard to whether or not such a contract may be executed shall be submitted to the voters for approval or rejection in the same manner that bond issues for capital purposes are submitted to the voters: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any school district may jointly with another school district execute contracts authorized by this section.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.550. Prior: 1965 c 62 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.550, 28.58.550.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.

Transportation vehicle fund—Deposits in—Use—Rules for establishment and use: RCW 28A.160.130.